Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-202
Department of Agriculture; Bureau of Animal Industry; State Veterinarian; exercise of powers.

Within the Department of Agriculture there shall be a Bureau of Animal Industry, with the State Veterinarian in charge, subordinate only to the Director of Agriculture. The powers and duties of the department provided by law for the protection of the health of livestock as defined in section 54-701.03 shall be exercised and discharged through the Bureau of Animal Industry under the direction of the State Veterinarian.

Laws 1933, c. 149, § 4, p. 572;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-107;

R.S.1943, § 81-202;

Laws 1961, c. 419, § 2, p. 1282;

Laws 1965, c. 334, § 9, p. 958;

Laws 1993, LB 267, § 26.

For livestock, general provisions, see Chapter 54.

For pathogenic microorganisms, see sections 71-1801 to 71-1805.

Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act, see section 38-3301.